California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1186, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [35510. - 35517.]

35510.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35700).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35511.

An “action to reorganize districts” means either of the following:

(a) An action to form a new school district, which is accomplished through any of, or any combination of, the following:

(1) Dissolving two or more existing school districts of the same kind and forming one or more new school districts of that same kind from the entire territory of the original districts.

(2) Forming one or more new school districts of the same kind from all or parts of one or more existing school districts of that same kind.

(3) Unifying school districts, including the
 consolidation of all or part of one or more high school districts with all or part of one or more component school districts into one or more new unified school districts.

(4) Deunifying a school district, including the conversion of all or part of a unified school district into one or more new high school districts, each with two or more new component districts.

(b) An action to transfer territory, including the transfer of all or part of an existing school district to another existing school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   (AB 174)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

35512.

“County committee” means the county committee on school district organization, organized and acting as provided for in Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Part 3, or the county board of education, organized and acting as provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4020) of Chapter 1 of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 213.)
-------------------------------------------

35513.

For the purposes of any reference in this chapter to “districts of the same kind,” all elementary school districts are districts of the same kind, all high school districts are districts of the same kind, and all unified school districts are districts of the same kind.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35514.

As used in this chapter and in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35700):

(a) “Affected district” means a school district that has been, or is proposed to be, affected by an action to reorganize pursuant to Section 35511 or by an action to lapse a school district pursuant to Section 35780.1. Affected districts include all of the following school district types:

(1) “Original district” means a school district as it existed before an action to reorganize pursuant to Section 35511 or before an action to lapse a school district pursuant to Section 35780.1. The boundaries of an “original district” are those of the school district as it existed immediately before the action to reorganize
 or lapse.

(2) “Former district” means a school district that has been wholly included in another school district, or has had all of its territory made part of two or more other school districts, through any action taken pursuant to Section 35511 or through a lapsation pursuant to Section 35780.1. The boundaries of a former district are those of the school district as it existed immediately before an action to reorganize or lapse.

(3) “New district” means a school district that is formed from all or portions of one or more other school districts by an action to reorganize taken pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 35511. A new district does not exist before such an action.

(4) “Acquiring district” means a school district that has all or portions of one or more other school districts transferred into, or lapsed into,
 its boundaries pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35511 or Section 35780.1.

(5) “Divided district” means a school district that has had a portion of its territory become part of a new school district or transferred into one or more other school districts by an action to reorganize taken pursuant to Section 35511.

(A) The “reorganized portion of a divided district” means the portion of the divided school district’s territory that becomes part of a new school district or is transferred into one or more other school districts.

(B) The “remaining portion of a divided district” means the portion of the divided school district’s territory that does not become part of a new school district or that is not transferred into one or more other school districts.

(6) “Reorganized district” means a school district that is a “new district,” an “acquiring district,” or a “divided district.”

(b) “Districts” means school districts of every kind or class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 4.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35515.

“Component district” means an elementary school district that is included within a high school district or an elementary school district that is excluded from an action to unify a high school district but that continues to feed into the high schools of the new unified school district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35542.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 3.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35517.

“Uninhabited territory” means territory in which fewer than 12 persons are registered to vote at least 54 days before the time of filing of a petition or adoption of a resolution for a school district boundary change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 344, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reorganization of Districts Under the Jurisdiction of Different Counties [35520. - 35524.]

35520.

In any action to reorganize school districts, which are located in more than one county and are under the jurisdiction of different county superintendents of schools, the proceedings to be conducted or the actions to be taken by county officers or agencies shall be conducted or taken in each of the counties involved, except as provided in this article or as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35521.

Any petition to a county officer or agency in an action referred to in Section 35520 shall be presented in each county. The sufficiency of the petition shall be determined jointly by the county superintendents who have jurisdiction over the districts in which any petitioners reside.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35522.

Any election in an action referred to in Section 35520 shall be called and conducted by each county superintendent in the districts which are under his or her jurisdiction and in which the election is to be held. The designation of the date and hours of the election, the form and content of the ballot, and the declaration of the result of the election shall be by joint action of the county superintendents having jurisdiction over the districts who call and conduct the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35523.

Any public hearing required, or allowed to be held, in an action referred to in Section 35520 may be conducted in each county, or jointly in either county, as it appears most convenient and practical to the county officers or agencies conducting the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35524.

Any decision in an action referred to in Section 35520 to recommend reorganization or to recommend approval or disapproval of a petition for reorganization may be taken at, or following, a joint public hearing. If separate hearings are conducted in each county, a decision to grant or deny the proposed reorganization shall be made only after findings and tentative conclusions of the hearings in each county have been transmitted to the officer or agency which conducted the hearings in each of the other counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Completion and Effective Dates for Action [35530. - 35537.]

35530.

An action to reorganize districts is complete when the board of supervisors makes the order required pursuant to Section 35765.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35531.

An action to form a unified school district pursuant to Section 35542 is complete upon the date of completion of the action by which the boundaries of the school districts comprising the unified school district become coterminous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 5.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35532.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, in any school district which is created or whose boundaries or status is changed by an action to reorganize districts, the changes shall be effective on the date when all of the following are completed:

(a) The determination of the assessed valuation of any district or districts affected by the action.

(b) The appointment or election of members of the governing board.

(c) The preparation and submission of the school district budgets.

(d) The election or appointment of an executive officer and other employees required to service the immediate needs of the district.

(e) The election or appointment of employees for the ensuing school year.

(f) The calling and conducting of any elections authorized by law relative to the financing of the district, including bonded indebtedness, tax rates, and State School Building Fund.

(g) The expenditure of funds available to the district.

(h) The exercise by the governing board of the school district of other powers and duties vested in governing boards of the districts of the same type of class and not inconsistent with other provisions of this code.

(i) The receipt and expenditure of funds transferred pursuant to Section 42623.

(j) The issuing and selling of bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35533.

Any district which is reorganized so as to be wholly absorbed into one or more other districts shall, after the date the action is complete and until the action is effective for all purposes, continue to have all of the powers and duties vested in governing boards of the same kind and not inconsistent with other provisions of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35534.

Except as provided in Sections 35536 and 35786 and subject to compliance with Section 54900 of the Government Code, any action to reorganize a school district shall be effective for all purposes on July 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the action is completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 7.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35536.

At any time after the appointment or election of the governing board of a school district and the naming of the school district, the board may secure an option to purchase land for school purposes for which school district bonds may be issued. The board may proceed, thereafter, in accordance with the provisions of this code, governing the issuance of school district bonds, with the same effect as though control of the property of the district had already been vested in the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35537.

Notwithstanding Section 35534, where a petition for reorganization and change of boundaries of one or more school districts involves a transfer of territory and the territory is uninhabited land and all districts involved consent to the transfer of territory, the effective date of the reorganization relating to the formation of a community facilities district and all matters relating to the authorization of a special tax pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, as well as bonds and the sale thereof, shall be the date agreed upon by the respective school districts, which, in any event, shall be no earlier than the date of the last resolution approved by a school district governing board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 35709.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Territory of School Districts [35540. - 35545.]

35540.

The boundaries of each high school district and unified school district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the component districts, as defined in Section 35515, included within it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35541.

When the boundaries of a district which is a component of a high school district or a unified school district, as defined in Section 35515, are for any cause changed to include territory in, or to exclude from, the district, the territory added to, or removed from, the district shall, at the same time, be included in, or excluded from, the high school district or unified school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35542.

(a) Whenever the boundaries of an elementary school district and a high school district become coterminous, the districts are merged into a new unified district.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an elementary school district that has boundaries that are totally within a high school district may be excluded from an action to unify those districts if the governing board receives approval for an exclusion from the county committee if the conditions of subdivision (b) of Section 35710 are met or from the state board if those conditions are not met. Any elementary school district so authorized to be excluded from an action to unify
 may continue to feed into the coterminous high school under the same terms that existed before any action to unify pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 8.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35543.

On or after January 1, 1981, a school district shall not be formed or reorganized to include territory which is separated from other portions of the territory of the district by the territory of one or more other school districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35544.

Whenever territory is transferred or added by means of reorganization to another district in which trustee areas have been established, the territory being transferred shall become a part of the trustee areas to which it is contiguous. In the event that the territory being transferred is contiguous to more than one trustee area, terms of agreement to the transfer may include provisions for the division of the transferred territory among the trustee areas to which it is contiguous.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35545.

(a) Before the date upon which a reorganized district becomes effective for all purposes, the county committee may include all, or part of, the territory in plans and recommendations for further reorganization.

(b) During the first five years after the effective date for all purposes of the formation of a new district, no territory shall be removed from the school district without the consent of the governing board of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 6.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Personnel in Reorganized Districts [35555. - 35559.]

35555.

(a) The reorganization of any school district or school districts shall not affect the classification of certificated employees already employed by any school district affected. Those employees have the same status with respect to their classification by the school district, including time served as probationary employees of the school district, after the reorganization as they had before it. If the reorganization results in the school or other place in which the employee is employed being maintained by another school district, the employee, if a permanent employee of the school district that formerly maintained the school or other place of employment, shall be employed as a permanent employee of the school district that thereafter maintains the
 school or other place of employment, unless the employee elects before February 1 of the year in which the action will become effective for all purposes to continue in the employ of the first school district.

(b) If the employee is a probationary employee of the school district that formerly maintained the school or other place of employment, he or she shall be employed by the school district that thereafter maintains the school or other place of employment, unless the probationary employee is terminated by the school district pursuant to Section 44929.21, 44948, 44948.3, 44949, or 44955, and, if not so terminated, his or her status with respect to classification by the school district shall be the same as it would have been had the school or other place of employment continued to be maintained by the school district that formerly maintained it. As used in this paragraph, “the school or other place in which the employee is employed” and all
 references thereto, includes, but is not necessarily limited to, the school services or school program that, as a result of any reorganization of a school district, will be provided by another school district, irrespective of whether any particular building or buildings in which the schoolwork or school program was conducted is physically located in the reorganized district and irrespective of whether any reorganized district elects to provide for the education of its pupils by contracting with another school district until the reorganized district constructs its own facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 7.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35556.

(a) The reorganization of any school district, or school districts, shall not affect the rights of persons employed in positions not requiring certification qualifications to retain the salary, leaves, and other benefits that they would have had if the reorganization had not occurred. These persons shall be treated in the manner provided in this section.

(b) All employees of every school district that is included in any other school district, or all school districts included in a new district, shall become employees of the new district.

(c) (1) When a portion of the territory of any school district
 becomes part of another school district, employees regularly assigned to perform their duties in the territory affected shall become employees of the acquiring district unless, in a manner consistent with relevant provisions of this code and with any applicable collective bargaining agreement, one of the following events occurs:

(A) An employee elects to accept a vacant position, for which he or she qualifies, that the original district elects to fill.

(B) An employee elects to fill, by exercise of his or her rights of seniority under existing law or the collective bargaining agreement with the original district, a position, for which he or she qualifies, in the original district.

(C) An employee elects to have his or her name entered on a reemployment list of the original district.

(2) Employees whose assignments pertained to the affected territory, but whose employment situs was not in that territory, may elect to remain with the original district or become employees of the acquiring district.

(d) When the territory of any school district is divided between, or among, two or more new or acquiring districts, and the original district ceases to exist, employees of the original district regularly assigned to perform their duties in any specific territory of the school district shall become employees of the school district acquiring the territory. Employees not assigned to specific territory within the original district shall become employees of any acquiring district at the election of the employees.

(e) An employee regularly assigned by the original district to any school in the school district
 shall be an employee of the school district in which the school is located unless that employee elects to continue in the employ of the original district pursuant to subdivision (c).

(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive the governing board of the new or acquiring district from making reasonable reassignments of duties.

(g) The amendments to this section made during the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature shall apply only to school district reorganizations commenced on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 8.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35557.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5000, whenever, in a district that has been wholly absorbed into one or more other districts and continues in existence as a district until the reorganization in which it has been included is effective for all purposes and a governing board member election is otherwise required to be held prior to the effective date of the reorganization, no election shall be held. Instead, the county superintendent of schools shall appoint successors to the members whose terms expire on the first Friday in December following the date upon which the election would otherwise have been held. The appointees shall hold office until the reorganization becomes effective for all purposes.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to any school district governed by a city board of education whenever the school district has been included with other school district territory within a unification effected pursuant to this chapter, where both of the following apply:

(1) The charter of the city involved requires an election of city school district governing board members to be held prior to the date the new unified district becomes effective for all purposes.

(2) The governing board of the new unified school district is organized to be subject to the provisions of this code rather than the provisions of the city charter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5002 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35558.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 35105 and 5000, in the case of a unified school district formed in an even-numbered year, where in connection with the formation of which the first governing board was elected in that even-numbered year, all of the members of the first elected governing board shall serve until the first Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered year. Their successors shall be elected at an election conducted on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the second succeeding odd-numbered year. The majority of successors receiving the highest number of votes shall serve until the first Friday in December of the second odd-numbered year thereafter succeeding. The other members’ terms shall expire on the first Friday in December of the first odd-numbered year thereafter succeeding.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the governing board of a unified school district formed in an even-numbered year may provide, pursuant to an appropriate resolution adopted by the governing board, that the majority of the members of the governing board who received the highest number of votes in the first election of governing board members for the district shall serve until the first Friday in December of the third odd-numbered year succeeding that first election, and that the other members’ terms shall expire on the first Friday in December of the second odd-numbered year succeeding that first election. The resolution described in this subdivision shall be adopted on or before March 15 of the second odd-numbered year succeeding the first election of the governing board.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5003 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35559.

Notwithstanding Sections 5000 and 35105, when the first elected board of any new district is elected on the same date that the election is held for adopting the proposal for the formation of the new district and when the terms of several members of the first governing board would expire before the date on which the school district becomes effective for all purposes, no election shall be held in November of that odd-numbered year, but the several members whose terms expire shall serve until April 30 of the next succeeding even-numbered year. A governing board election shall be held on the second Tuesday in April of that even-numbered year to fill the offices of the members whose terms expire on the April 30 next succeeding the election. The terms of office of the
 members so elected shall expire on the first Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered year. Their successors shall be elected pursuant to Section 5000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 9.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Disposition of Records, Funds, Property, and Obligations When Reorganized [35560. - 35566.]

35560.

When a school district is reorganized, both of the following shall apply:

 (a) When the allocation of funds, property, and obligations is not fixed by terms, conditions, or recommendations as provided by law, the funds, property, and obligations of a former district, except for bonded indebtedness, shall be allocated as follows:

(1) The real property and personal property and fixtures normally situated thereat shall be the property of the district in which the real property is located.

(2) All other property, funds, and obligations, except bonded indebtedness, shall be divided
 pro rata among the districts in which the territory of the former district is included. The basis for the division and allocation shall be the assessed valuation of the part of the former district which is included within each of the districts.

(b) Any qualified special taxes may continue to be imposed pursuant to Section 50079.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 276, Sec. 1.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

35561.

Any funds derived from the sale of the school bonds issued by the original district shall be used for the acquisition, construction, or improvement of school property only in the territory that comprised the original district or to discharge bonded indebtedness of the original district, except that, if the bonded indebtedness is assumed by the new or acquiring district, the funds may be used in any area of the new district for the purposes for which the bonds were originally voted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 10.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35562.

If all the territory of a school district becomes part of two or more school districts of any type, and the inclusion in the two or more new or acquiring districts of the several portions of territory comprising the whole of the former district is effective for all purposes on the same date, the records of the former district shall be disposed of as follows:

(a) All records of the former district that are required by law to be kept on file shall be deposited with the governing board of the school district which, after the reorganization has become effective for all purposes, has located within its boundaries the former office of the superintendent of the original district.

(b) Records of employees shall be transferred to the school district thereafter employing the personnel or thereafter maintaining the last place of employment.

(c) Records of pupils shall be transferred to the school district that, after the date on which the reorganization becomes effective for all purposes, maintains the school in which a pupil was last enrolled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 11.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35563.

(a) If all of the territory of a school district becomes part of two or more school districts of any type, and the inclusion in the two or more new school districts of the several portions of territory comprising the former district is effective for all purposes on the same date, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the former district shall assume responsibility for all of the following:

(1) Completing all records and reports of the former district.

(2) Paying all outstanding obligations, except obligations resulting from contracts that are to be assumed by a new or acquiring district.

(3) Preparing for proper filing all records of the former district required to be kept permanently by the provisions of any applicable code.

(4) Distributing records as provided in Section 35562.

(5) Employing an auditor as required in Section 41020.

(6) Discharging other functions that he or she deems necessary to the dissolution of the school district.

(b) In discharging these duties, the county superintendent of schools may request the services of employees of the original district or the new or acquiring district, and the new or acquiring districts shall release those employees to the county superintendent of schools for the purpose of accomplishing the requirements of this section. The
 salaries of those employees and all other necessary expenses of completing the requirements of this section shall be charged against the accumulated funds of the former district before the final distribution of those funds to the new or acquiring districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 12.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35564.

If the reorganization of a school district under this chapter results in the relocation of district boundaries so that a portion of the pupils will not be residents of the district thereafter maintaining a school previously attended by the pupils, and if there is in the school an organized student body, the property, funds, and obligations of the student body shall be divided as determined by the county committee, except that the share shall not exceed an amount equal to the ratio which the number of pupils leaving the school bears to the total number of pupils enrolled. The ownership of the property, funds, and obligations, which is the proportionate share of each segment of the student body, shall be transferred to the student body of the school or schools in which the pupils are enrolled after the reorganization. Funds from devises, bequests, or gifts made to the organized student body of a school shall remain the property of the organized student body of that school and shall not be divided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35565.

If a dispute arises between the governing boards of the districts concerning the division of funds, property, or obligations, a board of arbitrators shall be appointed which shall resolve the dispute. The board shall consist of one person selected by each district from which territory is withdrawn pursuant to a reorganization action under this chapter, one person selected by each district of which territory has become a part pursuant to that reorganization action, and either one or two persons, such that the board of arbitrators contains an odd number of persons, appointed by the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the districts are located. The districts involved may mutually agree that a person appointed as arbitrator by the county superintendent of schools may act as sole arbitrator of the matters to be submitted to arbitration. The necessary expenses and compensation of the arbitrators shall be divided equally between the districts, and the payment of the portion of the expenses is a legal charge against the funds of the school districts. The arbitrator or arbitrators shall make a written finding on the matter submitted to arbitration. The written finding and determination of a majority of the board of arbitrators is final and binding upon the school districts submitting the question to the board of arbitration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 409, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35566.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, exchanges of property tax revenues between school districts as a result of an action to reorganize shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 99 of the Revenue and Taxation Code if one or more affected districts receive only basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 13.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Bonded Indebtedness of School Districts [35570. - 35579.]

35570.

This article applies only to the reallocation of bonded indebtedness of a school district on general obligation bonds under one of the following conditions:

(a) The bonded indebtedness was approved by the voters prior to July 1, 1978.

(b) The bonded indebtedness was incurred for the acquisition or improvement of real property and was approved on or after July 1, 1978, by two-thirds of the votes cast by the voters voting on the proposition.

(c) The bonded indebtedness was incurred for the acquisition or improvement of real property and was approved on or after July 1, 1978, by 55 percent of the votes cast by the voters voting on the proposition at a regularly scheduled election or a statewide special election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 730, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

35571.

When a school district is created, annexed, or abolished, or the boundaries thereof changed, the liability to taxation for the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district or the territory affected thereby is as provided in this article. The authorities whose duty it is to levy taxes for the payment of principal and interest on the outstanding bonds shall levy the taxes upon the districts affected in such proportions as are provided in, or are determined under, the authority of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35572.

No territory shall be taken from any school district having any outstanding bonded indebtedness and made a part of another school district where the action, if taken, would so reduce the last equalized assessed valuation of the divided district so that the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the divided district would exceed 5 percent of the assessed valuation in the remaining territory of the divided district for each level maintained, on the date the reorganization is effective pursuant to Section 35766.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 14.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35573.

When any school district is in any manner merged with one or more school districts so as to form a single district by any procedure, the district so formed is liable for all of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the districts united or merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35574.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, for the purposes of applying the State School Building Aid Law of 1952 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1), the amount of outstanding bonded indebtedness, exclusive of interest, of the former or divided districts that is equal to the liability incurred by the new or acquiring district pursuant to Section 35576 shall be considered a liability of the new or acquiring district for purposes of computing the bonding capacity of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 15.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35575.

When territory is taken from one school district and annexed to another school district and the area transferred contains no public school property or buildings, the territory shall drop any liability for outstanding bonded indebtedness in the district of which it was formerly a part and shall automatically assume its proportionate share of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district of which it becomes a part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35576.

(a) If territory is taken from one school district and annexed to, or included in, a new or acquiring district by any procedure, and the area transferred contains real property, the new or acquiring district shall take possession of the real property, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 35560, on the day when the action to reorganize becomes effective for all purposes. The reorganized territory shall cease to be liable for the bonded indebtedness of the school district of which it was formerly a part, and shall automatically assume its proportionate share of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of any school district of which it becomes a part.

(b) The new or acquiring district shall be liable for the
 greater of the amounts determined under provisions of paragraph (1) or (2), or the amount determined pursuant to a method prescribed under Section 35738.

(1) The proportionate share of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the original district, which proportionate share shall be in the ratio that the total assessed valuation of the transferring territory bears to the total assessed valuation of the original district in the year immediately preceding the date on which the action to reorganize is effective for all purposes. This ratio shall be used each year until the bonded indebtedness for which the new or acquiring district is liable has been repaid.

(2) The portion of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the original district that was incurred for the acquisition or improvement of real property, or fixtures located on the real property, and situated in the reorganized
 territory.
